Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB44.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) It is hereby declared that antisemitism and
antisemitic acts are against the public policy of this state, including, but
not limited to, the purposes of public educational institutions and law
enforcement agencies in this state. The state of Kansas hereby adopts a
non-legally binding definition of antisemitism and antisemitic.
(b) "Antisemitism" or "antisemitic" means the same as defined by
the international Holocaust rememberance alliance's working definition
of antisemitism, including the contemporary examples, as in effect on
May 26, 2016. "Antisemitism" or "antisemitic" includes:
(A) Encouraging, supporting, praising, participating in or
threatening violence or vandalism against Jewish people or property;
(B) wearing masks to conceal a person's identity with the intent to
harass or discriminate against Jewish students, faculty or employees on
school property; and
(C) incorporating or allowing funding of antisemitic curriculum or
activities in any domestic or study abroad programs or classes.
(c) Nothing in this act shall be construed to diminish or infringe
upon any right protected under the first amendment to the constitution
of the United States or the bill of rights of the constitution of the state
of Kansas.

SENATE BILL No. 44—page 2
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the Kansas register.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the
SENATE, and passed that body
__________________________
SENATE adopted
________________
Conference Committee Report
_________________________
President of the Senate.
_________________________
Secretary of the Senate.
Passed the HOUSE
_________________________
as amended
HOUSE adopted
________________
Conference Committee Report
_________________________
Speaker of the House.
_________________________
Chief Clerk of the House.
_____________________________
APPROVED
_________________________
Governor.